District of Columbia statutes.
26-1152.12

Prepayment premium, fee or charge.

A lender shall not include in a covered loan or collect or attempt to collect any prepayment premium, fee, or charge in violation of Chapter 33 of Title 28.

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 212, 49 DCR 2551
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 212 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).